Georgia, session 2025_26, HB413.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 1 of Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to general provisions
regarding agriculture, is amended by revising Code Section 2-1-6, relating to preemption of
local ordinances relating to production of agricultural or farm products, as follows:
"2-1-6.
(a) No county, municipality, consolidated government, or other political subdivision of this
state shall adopt or enforce any ordinance, rule, regulation, or resolution regulating crop
management or animal husbandry practices involved in the production of agricultural or
farm products on any private property.
(a.1)(1) As used in this subsection, the term:
H. B. 413
- 1 -

LC 44 3031
(A) 'Agricultural land' means any land capable of use in the production of agricultural
crops, timber, livestock or livestock products, poultry or poultry products, milk or dairy
products, or fruit or other horticultural products, but does not include any land zoned
by a local governmental unit for a use other than and nonconforming with agricultural
use.
(B) 'Mobile sawmill' means an engine powered sawing or cutting machine used to turn
logs into lumber, regardless of whether attached to a trailer or truck mounted, that may
be transported among and used at multiple sites. Such machines shall be considered
agricultural equipment.
(2) No county, municipality, consolidated government, or other political subdivision of
this state shall adopt or enforce any ordinance, rule, regulation, or resolution prohibiting
or restricting the use of mobile sawmills on agricultural land, including, but not limited
to, processing timber from properties other than the one on which the mobile sawmill is
located.
(3) All waste produced by sawing logs, including sawdust, bark, and slab materials, shall
be considered agricultural products. The lumber produced by mobile sawmills,
regardless of whether it is green, kiln dried, or surfaced, shall also be considered an
agricultural product.
(b) Subsection (a) Subsections (a) and (a.1) of this Code section shall not prohibit or
impair the power of any local government to adopt or enforce any zoning ordinance or
make any other zoning decision. As used in this subsection, the terms 'local government',
'local government,' 'zoning decision', 'zoning decision,' and 'zoning ordinance' shall have
the same meanings provided by meanings as set forth in Code Section 36-66-3.
(c) Subsection (a) Subsections (a) and (a.1) of this Code section shall not prohibit or
impair any existing power of a county, municipality, consolidated government, or other
political subdivision of this state to adopt or enforce any ordinance, rule, regulation, or
resolution regulating land application of human waste."
H. B. 413
- 2 -

LC 44 3031
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 413
- 3 -